District of Columbia statutes.
1-154

Use of donations and grants for flag replacement.

The Mayor is authorized to solicit, receive, accept, and expend donations or grants from private sources to defray the costs of replacing existing District of Columbia flags with flags that include the language prescribed in § 1-152(a).

Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-237, § 5, 49 DCR 10485
This section is referenced in § 1-174.
2001 Ed., § 1-174.